test/data/dictyamls/dict-gt-yamls/N-Clex_aahus_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - ááhuš: # to be checked
    ááhuš+N+Sg+Nom: ááhuš
    ááhuš+N+Sg+Gen: ahhuu
    ááhuš+N+Sg+Acc: ahhuu
    ááhuš+N+Sg+Ill: áhužân
    ááhuš+N+Sg+Loc: ahhuust
    ááhuš+N+Sg+Com: ahhuin
    ááhuš+N+Sg+Abe: ahhuuttáá
    ááhuš+N+Ess: [áhužin, ahhun]
    ááhuš+N+Par: [áhužid, ahhud]
    ááhuš+N+Pl+Nom: ahhuuh
    ááhuš+N+Pl+Gen: ahhui
    ááhuš+N+Pl+Acc: ahhuid
    ááhuš+N+Pl+Ill: ahhuid
    ááhuš+N+Pl+Loc: ahhuin
    ááhuš+N+Pl+Com: ahhuiguin
    ááhuš+N+Pl+Abe: ahhuittáá
    
  Noun - kuáđhuš: # to be checked
    kuáđhuš+N+Sg+Nom: kuáđhuš
    kuáđhuš+N+Sg+Gen: kuođˊhuu
    kuáđhuš+N+Sg+Acc: kuođˊhuu
    kuáđhuš+N+Sg+Ill: kuáđhužân
    kuáđhuš+N+Sg+Loc: kuođˊhuust
    kuáđhuš+N+Sg+Com: kuođˊhuin
    kuáđhuš+N+Sg+Abe: kuođˊhuuttáá
    kuáđhuš+N+Ess: kuáˊđhužin
    kuáđhuš+N+Par: kuáˊđhužid
    kuáđhuš+N+Pl+Nom: kuođˊhuuh
    kuáđhuš+N+Pl+Gen: kuođˊhui
    kuáđhuš+N+Pl+Acc: kuođˊhuid
    kuáđhuš+N+Pl+Ill: kuođˊhuid
    kuáđhuš+N+Pl+Loc: kuođˊhuin
    kuáđhuš+N+Pl+Com: kuođˊhuiguin
    kuáđhuš+N+Pl+Abe: kuođˊhuittáá  
   
 
